Utah statutes.
53-3-508.   Local boards of education may conduct class for adults.

Local boards of education, with the consent of the division, may conduct classes in driver education for adult members of the district in those areas of the state where no commercial driver training course is available, and may charge a fee not to exceed the cost of the training.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

